Idaho, session 2026, H0552.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-1203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-1203. COURTS TO REPORT NONPAYMENT OF JUDGMENTS -- NONRESI-
DENTS. (1) Whenever any person fails within sixty (60) days to satisfy a
judgment, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court, or of the judge of a
court, which that has no clerk, in which a judgment is rendered within this
state, to forward to the department immediately after the expiration of the
sixty (60) days, a certified copy record of the judgment.
(2) If the defendant named in any certified copy record of a judgment
reported to the department is a nonresident, the department shall transmit
a certified copy record of the judgment to the official in charge of the is-
suance of drivers' licenses of the state of which the defendant is a resident
of.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-8002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8002. TESTS OF DRIVER FOR ALCOHOL CONCENTRATION, PRESENCE OF DRUGS
OR OTHER INTOXICATING SUBSTANCES -- PENALTY AND SUSPENSION UPON REFUSAL OF
TESTS. (1) Any person who drives or is in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle in this state shall be deemed to have given his consent to eviden-
tiary testing for concentration of alcohol as defined in section 18-8004,
Idaho Code, and to have given his consent to evidentiary testing for the
presence of drugs or other intoxicating substances, provided that such
testing is administered at the request of a peace officer having reasonable
grounds to believe that the person has been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle in violation of the provisions of section 18-8004
or 18-8006, Idaho Code.
(2) Such person shall not have the right to consult with an attorney be-
fore submitting to such evidentiary testing.


(3) At the time evidentiary testing for concentration of alcohol or for
the presence of drugs or other intoxicating substances is requested, the
person shall be informed that if he refuses to submit to or if he fails to
complete evidentiary testing:
(a) He is subject to a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250)
for refusing to take the test;
(b) He is subject to mandatory installation of a state-approved igni-
tion interlock system, at his expense, on all of the motor vehicles op-
erated by him for a period to end one (1) year following the end of the
suspension period;
(c) He has the right to request a hearing within seven (7) business days
to show cause why he refused to submit to or complete evidentiary test-
ing;
(d) If he does not request a hearing or does not prevail at the hearing,
the court shall sustain the civil penalty and shall order the required
installation of a state-approved ignition interlock system on all motor
vehicles operated by him and his driver's license will be suspended ab-
solutely for one (1) year if this is his first refusal and two (2) years
if this is his second refusal within ten (10) years;
(e) Provided however, if he is admitted to a problem solving court pro-
gram and has served at least forty-five (45) days of an absolute sus-
pension of driving privileges, then he may be eligible for a restricted
permit for the purpose of getting to and from work, school or an alcohol
treatment program, but only if a state-approved ignition interlock sys-
tem has been installed, at his expense, on all motor vehicles operated
by him; and
(f) After submitting to evidentiary testing, he may, when practicable,
at his own expense, have additional tests made by a person of his own
choosing.
(4) If the motorist refuses to submit to or complete evidentiary test-
ing after the information has been given in accordance with subsection (3) of
this section:
(a) He shall be fined a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars
($250);
(b) The court shall direct the installation, at his expense, of a state-
approved ignition interlock system meeting the requirements set forth
in section 18-8008, Idaho Code, on all motor vehicles operated by him
for a period of one (1) year following the end of the suspension period;
(c) A written request may be made within seven (7) calendar business
days for a hearing before the court; if requested, the hearing must be
held within thirty (30) days of the date of service unless this period
is, for good cause shown, extended by the court for one (1) additional
thirty (30) day period. The hearing shall be limited to the question
of why the defendant did not submit to or complete evidentiary test-
ing, and the burden of proof shall be upon on the defendant; the court
shall sustain a two hundred fifty dollar ($250) civil penalty immedi-
ately, suspend all the defendant's driving privileges immediately for
one (1) year for a first refusal and two (2) years for a second refusal
within ten (10) years and direct the installation, at his expense, of a
state-approved ignition interlock system meeting the requirements set


forth in section 18-8008, Idaho Code, on all motor vehicles operated by
him for a period to end one (1) year following the end of the suspension
period, unless it finds that the peace officer did not have legal cause
to stop and request him to take the test or that the request violated his
civil rights. Failure to appear at a requested hearing shall be consid-
ered a default judgment against the defendant;
(d) If a hearing is not requested by written notice to the court con-
cerned within seven (7) calendar business days, upon receipt of a sworn
statement by the peace officer of the circumstances of the refusal, the
court shall sustain a two hundred fifty dollar ($250) civil penalty,
suspend the defendant's driving privileges for one (1) year for a first
refusal and two (2) years for a second refusal within ten (10) years,
during which time he shall have absolutely no driving privileges of
any kind, and direct the installation of a state-approved ignition in-
terlock system, at his expense, meeting the requirements set forth in
section 18-8008, Idaho Code, on all motor vehicles operated by him for
a period to end one (1) year following the end of the suspension period.
Failure to request a hearing shall be considered a default judgment
against the defendant;
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (c) and (d) of this
subsection, if the defendant is enrolled in and is a participant in good
standing in a drug court or mental health court approved by the supreme
court drug court and mental health court coordinating committee under
the provisions of chapter 56, title 19, Idaho Code, or other similar
problem solving court utilizing community-based sentencing alterna-
tives, then the defendant shall be eligible for restricted noncommer-
cial driving privileges for the purpose of getting to and from work,
school or an alcohol treatment program, which may be granted by the pre-
siding judge of the drug court or mental health court or other similar
problem solving court, provided that the defendant has served a period
of absolute suspension of driving privileges of at least forty-five
(45) days, that a state-approved ignition interlock system meeting the
requirements set forth in section 18-8008, Idaho Code, is installed,
at his expense, on all motor vehicles operated by him for a period to
end one (1) year following the end of the suspension period and that the
defendant has shown proof of financial responsibility as defined and
in the amounts specified in section 49-117, Idaho Code, provided that
the restricted noncommercial driving privileges and the requirement
of a state-approved ignition interlock system may be continued if the
defendant successfully completes the drug court, mental health court or
other similar problem solving court, and that the court may revoke such
privileges for failure to comply with the terms of probation or with the
terms and conditions of the drug court, mental health court or other
similar problem solving court program; and
(f) After submitting to evidentiary testing at the request of the peace
officer, he may, when practicable, at his own expense, have additional
tests made by a person of his own choosing. The failure or inability to
obtain an additional test or tests by a person shall not preclude the ad-
mission of results of evidentiary testing for alcohol concentration or
for the presence of drugs or other intoxicating substances taken at the


direction of the peace officer unless the additional test was denied by
the peace officer.
(5) Any sustained sanction under this section or section 18-8002A,
Idaho Code, shall be a sanction separate and apart from any other sanction
imposed for a violation of other Idaho motor vehicle codes or for a con-
viction of an offense pursuant to this chapter and may be appealed to the
district court.
(6) No hospital, hospital officer, agent, or employee, or health care
professional licensed by the state of Idaho, whether or not such person has
privileges to practice in the hospital in which a body fluid sample is ob-
tained or an evidentiary test is made, shall incur any civil or criminal li-
ability for any act arising out of administering an evidentiary test for al-
cohol concentration or for the presence of drugs or other intoxicating sub-
stances at the request or order of a peace officer in the manner described in
this section and section 18-8002A, Idaho Code; provided that nothing in this
section shall relieve any such person or legal entity from civil liability
arising from the failure to exercise the community standard of care.
(a) This immunity extends to any person who assists any individual to
withdraw a blood sample for evidentiary testing at the request or order
of a peace officer, which individual is authorized to withdraw a blood
sample under the provisions of section 18-8003, Idaho Code, regardless
of the location where the blood sample is actually withdrawn.
(b) A peace officer is empowered to order an individual authorized in
section 18-8003, Idaho Code, to withdraw a blood sample for evidentiary
testing when the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the
suspect has committed any of the following offenses:
(i) Aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, drugs or
other intoxicating substances as provided in section 18-8006,
Idaho Code;
(ii) Vehicular manslaughter as provided in subsection (3)(a), (b)
and (c) of section 18-4006, Idaho Code;
(iii) Aggravated operating of a vessel on the waters of the state
while under the influence of alcohol, drugs or other intoxicating
substances as provided in section 67-7035, Idaho Code; or
(iv) Any criminal homicide involving a vessel on the waters of the
state while under the influence of alcohol, drugs or other intoxi-
cating substances.
(c) Nothing herein shall limit the discretion of the hospital admin-
istration to designate the qualified hospital employee responsible to
withdraw the blood sample.
(d) The law enforcement agency that requests or orders withdrawal of
the blood sample shall pay the reasonable costs to withdraw such blood
sample, perform laboratory analysis, preserve evidentiary test re-
sults, and testify in judicial proceedings. The court may order resti-
tution pursuant to the provisions of section 18-8003(2), Idaho Code.
(e) The withdrawal of the blood sample may be delayed or terminated if:
(i) In the reasonable judgment of the hospital personnel, with-
drawal of the blood sample may result in serious bodily injury to
hospital personnel or other patients; or


(ii) The licensed health care professional treating the suspect
believes the withdrawal of the blood sample is contraindicated be-
cause of the medical condition of the suspect or other patients.
(7) "Actual physical control" as used in this section and section
18-8002A, Idaho Code, shall be defined as being in the driver's position of
the motor vehicle with the motor running or with the motor vehicle moving.
(8) Any written notice required by this section shall be effective upon
mailing.
(9) For the purposes of this section and section 18-8002A, Idaho Code,
"evidentiary testing" shall mean means a procedure or test or series of pro-
cedures or tests, including the additional test authorized in subsection
(10) of this section, utilized to determine the concentration of alcohol or
the presence of drugs or other intoxicating substances in a person.
(10) A person who submits to a breath test for alcohol concentration,
as defined in subsection (4) of section 18-8004, Idaho Code, may also be re-
quested to submit to a second evidentiary test of blood or urine for the pur-
pose of determining the presence of drugs or other intoxicating substances
if the peace officer has reasonable cause to believe that a person was driv-
ing under the influence of any drug or intoxicating substance or the combined
influence of alcohol and any drug or intoxicating substance. The peace of-
ficer shall state in his or her report the facts upon on which that belief is
based.
(11) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
civil penalty imposed under pursuant to the provisions of this section must
be paid, as ordered by the court, to the county justice fund or the county
current expense fund where the incident occurred. If a person does not pay
the civil penalty imposed as provided in this section within thirty (30) days
of the imposition, unless this period has been extended by the court for good
cause shown, the prosecuting attorney representing the political subdivi-
sion where the incident occurred may petition the court in the jurisdiction
where the incident occurred to file the order imposing the civil penalty as
an order of the court. Once entered, the order may be enforced in the same
manner as a final judgment of the court. In addition to the civil penalty,
attorney's fees, costs and interest may be assessed against any person who
fails to pay the civil penalty.
(12) Upon petition of the person required to install an ignition in-
terlock device pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section, section
18-8002A(4), 18-8005(1)(e), or 18-8008, Idaho Code, a court in its dis-
cretion may relieve the person from the installation of the device where
the court finds it clear and convincing that the person will not present a
danger to the public or that there are exceptional or mitigating circum-
stances demonstrating that installation of the device is unnecessary or
unwarranted. Financial hardship, standing alone, is not an exceptional or
mitigating circumstance. If no civil or criminal case is pending related
to the order to install the ignition interlock device, a person may file a
petition for relief in magistrate court under this section in his county
of residence, or, if such person has no county of residence in Idaho, in
Ada county, if such petition is filed within thirty (30) days of the order
requiring the installation of the interlock device. While any petition for
judicial review in district court or motion or petition before a magistrate


court is pending, the ignition interlock device requirement shall be stayed.
The Idaho transportation department shall not be a party to any petition for
interlock relief filed before a court. An order for relief from the instal-
lation of the ignition interlock device from any court shall apply to all
statutory ignition interlock requirements.
(13) A court may determine that an offender is eligible to utilize
available funds from the court interlock device and electronic monitoring
device fund, as outlined in section 18-8010, Idaho Code, for the instal-
lation and operation of an ignition interlock device, based on evidence of
financial hardship.
(14) As used in this section, "at his expense" includes the cost of ob-
taining, installing, using and maintaining an ignition interlock system.
SECTION 3. That Section 18-8002A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8002A. TESTS OF DRIVER FOR ALCOHOL CONCENTRATION, PRESENCE OF
DRUGS OR OTHER INTOXICATING SUBSTANCES -- SUSPENSION UPON FAILURE OF
TESTS. (1) Definitions. As used in this section:
(a) "Actual physical control" means being in the driver's position of a
motor vehicle with the motor running or with the vehicle moving.
(b) "Administrative hearing" means a hearing conducted by a hearing
officer to determine whether a suspension imposed by the provisions of
this section should be vacated or sustained.
(c) "Department" means the Idaho transportation department and, as the
context requires, shall be construed to include any agent of the depart-
ment designated by rule as hereinafter provided.
(d) "Director" means the director of the Idaho transportation depart-
ment.
(e) "Evidentiary testing" means a procedure or test or series of proce-
dures or tests utilized to determine the concentration of alcohol or the
presence of drugs or other intoxicating substances in a person, includ-
ing additional testing authorized by subsection (6) of this section. An
evidentiary test for alcohol concentration shall be based on a formula
of grams of alcohol per one hundred (100) cubic centimeters of blood,
per two hundred ten (210) liters of breath, or per sixty-seven (67) mil-
liliters of urine. Analysis of blood, breath or urine for the purpose
of determining alcohol concentration shall be performed by a laboratory
operated by the Idaho state police or by a laboratory approved by the
Idaho state police under the provisions of approval and certification
standards to be set by the Idaho state police, or by any other method ap-
proved by the Idaho state police. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law or rule of court, the results of any test for alcohol concentra-
tion and records relating to calibration, approval, certification or
quality control performed by a laboratory operated and approved by the
Idaho state police or by any other method approved by the Idaho state po-
lice shall be admissible in any proceeding in this state without the ne-
cessity of producing a witness to establish the reliability of the test-
ing procedure for examination.
(f) "Hearing officer" means a person designated by the department to
conduct administrative hearings. The hearing officer shall have au-


thority to administer oaths, examine witnesses and take testimony,
receive relevant evidence, issue subpoenas, regulate the course and
conduct of the hearing and make a final ruling on the issues before him.
(g) "Hearing request" means a request for an administrative hearing on
the suspension imposed by the provisions of this section.
(2) Information to be given. At the time of evidentiary testing for
concentration of alcohol or for the presence of drugs or other intoxicating
substances is requested, the person shall be informed that if the person re-
fuses to submit to or fails to complete evidentiary testing, or if the per-
son submits to and completes evidentiary testing and the test results indi-
cate an alcohol concentration or the presence of drugs or other intoxicating
substances in violation of section 18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho Code,
the person shall be informed substantially as follows (but need not be in-
formed verbatim):
If you refuse to submit to or if you fail to complete and pass eviden-
tiary testing for alcohol or other intoxicating substances:
(a) The peace officer will issue a notice of suspension and you will be
required to install, at your expense, a state-approved ignition inter-
lock system on all motor vehicles you operate for a period to end one (1)
year following the end of the suspension period;
(b) You have the right to request a hearing within seven (7) business
days of the notice of suspension of your driver's license to show cause
why you refused to submit to or to complete and pass evidentiary testing
and why your driver's license should not be suspended;
(c) If you refused or failed to complete evidentiary testing and do not
request a hearing before the court or do not prevail at the hearing, your
driver's license will be suspended and you will be required to install,
at your expense, a state-approved ignition interlock system on all mo-
tor vehicles you operate for a period to end one (1) year following the
end of the suspension period. The suspension will be for one (1) year if
this is your first refusal. The suspension will be for two (2) years if
this is your second refusal within ten (10) years. You will not be able
to obtain a temporary restricted license during that period;
(d) If you complete evidentiary testing and fail the testing and do not
request a hearing before the department or do not prevail at the hear-
ing, your driver's license will be suspended and you will be required to
install, at your expense, a state-approved ignition interlock system on
all motor vehicles you operate for a period to end one (1) year following
the end of the suspension period. This suspension will be for ninety
(90) days if this is your first failure of evidentiary testing, but you
may request restricted noncommercial vehicle driving privileges after
the first thirty (30) days. The suspension will be for one (1) year
if this is your second failure of evidentiary testing within five (5)
years. You will not be able to obtain a temporary restricted license
during that period;
(e) However, if you are admitted to a problem solving court program and
have served at least forty-five (45) days of an absolute suspension of
driving privileges, you may be eligible for a restricted permit for the
purpose of getting to and from work, school or an alcohol treatment pro-


gram, but only if you install, at your expense, a state-approved igni-
tion interlock system on all motor vehicles you operate;
(f) However, if you are admitted to a diversion program under section
19-3509, Idaho Code, you may be eligible for a restricted permit for the
purpose of getting to and from work, school, medical appointments, or
a treatment program, but only if you install, at your expense, a state-
approved ignition interlock system on all motor vehicles you operate;
and
(g) After submitting to evidentiary testing, you may, when practica-
ble, at your own expense, have additional tests made by a person of your
own choosing.
(3) Rulemaking authority of the Idaho state police. The Idaho state po-
lice may, pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, prescribe by rule:
(a) What testing is required to complete evidentiary testing under this
section; and
(b) What calibration or checking of testing equipment must be performed
to comply with the department's requirements. Any rules of the Idaho
state police shall be in accordance with the following: a test for alco-
hol concentration in breath as defined in section 18-8004, Idaho Code,
and subsection (1)(e) of this section will be valid for the purposes of
this section if the breath alcohol testing instrument was approved for
testing by the Idaho state police in accordance with section 18-8004,
Idaho Code, at any time within ninety (90) days before the evidentiary
testing. A test for alcohol concentration in blood or urine as defined
in section 18-8004, Idaho Code, that is reported by the Idaho state po-
lice or by any laboratory approved by the Idaho state police to perform
this test will be valid for the purposes of this section.
(4) Suspension and ignition interlock system.
(a) Upon receipt of the sworn statement of a peace officer that there
existed legal cause to believe a person had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alco-
hol, drugs or other intoxicating substances and that the person submit-
ted to a test and the test results indicated an alcohol concentration or
the presence of drugs or other intoxicating substances in violation of
section 18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho Code, the department shall
suspend the person's driver's license, driver's permit, driving privi-
leges or nonresident driving privileges:
(i) For a period of ninety (90) days for a first failure of ev-
identiary testing under the provisions of this section. The
first thirty (30) days of the suspension shall be absolute and the
person shall have absolutely no driving privileges of any kind.
Restricted noncommercial vehicle driving privileges applicable
during the remaining sixty (60) days of the suspension may be re-
quested as provided in subsection (9) of this section.
(ii) For a period of one (1) year for a second and any subsequent
failure of evidentiary testing under the provisions of this sec-
tion within the immediately preceding five (5) years. No driving
privileges of any kind shall be granted during the suspension im-
posed pursuant to this subparagraph.


The department shall also direct the installation, at the offender's
expense, of a state-approved ignition interlock system meeting the re-
quirements of section 18-8008, Idaho Code, on all motor vehicles oper-
ated by the offender for a period to end one (1) year following the end of
the suspension period.
The person may request an administrative hearing on the suspension as
provided in subsection (7) of this section. Any right to contest the
suspension shall be waived if a hearing is not requested as therein pro-
vided.
(b) The suspension shall become effective thirty (30) days after ser-
vice upon the person of the notice of suspension and notice of the re-
quirement to install, at his expense, a state-approved ignition inter-
lock system for a period to end one (1) year following the end of the sus-
pension period. The notice shall be in a form provided by the department
and shall state:
(i) The reason and statutory grounds for the suspension and the
requirement to install the ignition interlock system;
(ii) The effective date of the suspension and the requirement to
install the ignition interlock system;
(iii) The suspension periods to which the person may be subject as
provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(iv) The procedures for obtaining restricted noncommercial vehi-
cle driving privileges;
(v) The rights of the person to request an administrative hear-
ing on the suspension and that, if an administrative hearing is not
requested within seven (7) business days of service of the notice
of suspension and notice of the requirement to install the igni-
tion interlock system, the right to contest the suspension shall
be waived;
(vi) The procedures for obtaining an administrative hearing on
the suspension;
(vii) The right to judicial review of the hearing officer's deci-
sion on the suspension and the procedures for seeking such review.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection, a person who is enrolled in and is a participant in
good standing in a drug court or mental health court approved by the
supreme court drug court and mental health court coordinating commit-
tee under the provisions of chapter 56, title 19, Idaho Code, or other
similar problem solving court utilizing community-based sentencing
alternatives shall be eligible for restricted noncommercial driving
privileges for the purpose of getting to and from work, school or an al-
cohol treatment program, which may be granted by the presiding judge of
the drug court or mental health court or other similar problem solving
court, provided that the offender has served a period of absolute sus-
pension of driving privileges of at least forty-five (45) days, that a
state-approved ignition interlock system is installed, at his expense,
on all motor vehicles operated by him for a period to end one (1) year
following the end of the suspension period and that the offender has
shown proof of financial responsibility as defined and in the amounts
specified in section 49-117, Idaho Code, provided that the restricted


noncommercial driving privileges may be continued if the offender
successfully completes the drug court, mental health court or other
similar problem solving court, and that the court may revoke such privi-
leges for failure to comply with the terms of probation or with the terms
and conditions of the drug court, mental health court or other similar
problem solving court program.
(5) Service of suspension and ignition interlock system by peace of-
ficer or the department. If the driver submits to evidentiary testing af-
ter the information in subsection (2) of this section has been provided and
the results of the test indicate an alcohol concentration or the presence
of drugs or other intoxicating substances in violation of the provisions of
section 18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho Code:
(a) The peace officer shall, acting on behalf of the department, serve
the person with a notice of suspension and notice of the requirement to
install, at his expense, a state-approved ignition interlock system for
a period to end one (1) year following the end of the suspension period
in the form and containing the information required under subsection
(4) of this section. The department may serve the person with a notice
of suspension and the requirement to install the ignition interlock
system if the peace officer failed to do so or failed to include the date
of service as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(b) Within five (5) business days following service of a notice of sus-
pension and notice of the requirement to install the ignition interlock
system, the peace officer shall forward to the department a copy of the
completed notice of suspension and notice of the requirement to install
the ignition interlock system form upon which the date of service upon
the driver shall be clearly indicated, a certified copy or duplicate
original of the results of all tests for alcohol concentration, as shown
by analysis of breath administered at the direction of the peace offi-
cer, and a sworn statement of the officer, which may incorporate any
arrest or incident reports relevant to the arrest and evidentiary test-
ing setting forth:
(i) The identity of the person;
(ii) Stating the officer's legal cause to stop the person;
(iii) Stating the officer's legal cause to believe that the per-
son had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, drugs or other in-
toxicating substances in violation of the provisions of section
18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho Code;
(iv) That the person was advised of the consequences of taking and
failing the evidentiary test as provided in subsection (2) of this
section;
(v) That the person was lawfully arrested;
(vi) That the person was tested for alcohol concentration, drugs
or other intoxicating substances as provided in this chapter, and
that the results of the test indicated an alcohol concentration or
the presence of drugs or other intoxicating substances in viola-
tion of the provisions of section 18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006,
Idaho Code.


If an evidentiary test of blood or urine was administered rather than
a breath test, the peace officer or the department shall serve the no-
tice of suspension once the results are received. The sworn statement
required in this subsection shall be made on forms in accordance with
rules adopted by the department.
(c) The department may serve the person with a notice of suspension if
the peace officer failed to issue the notice of suspension or failed to
include the date of service as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this
section.
(6) Additional tests. After submitting to evidentiary testing at the
request of the peace officer, the person may, when practicable, at his own
expense, have additional tests for alcohol concentration or for the presence
of drugs or other intoxicating substances made by a person of his own choos-
ing. The person's failure or inability to obtain additional tests shall not
preclude admission of the results of evidentiary tests administered at the
direction of the peace officer unless additional testing was denied by the
peace officer.
(7) Administrative hearing on suspension. A person who has been served
with a notice of suspension and notice of the requirement to install the ig-
nition interlock system after submitting to an evidentiary test may request
an administrative hearing on the suspension before a hearing officer desig-
nated by the department. The hearing may be held only on the suspension and
not on the requirement to install an ignition interlock system. The request
for hearing shall be in writing and must be received by the department within
seven (7) calendar business days of the date of service upon the person of
the notice of suspension and notice of the requirement to install the igni-
tion interlock system and shall include what issue or issues shall be raised
at the hearing. The date on which the hearing request was received shall be
noted on the face of the request. Failure to request a hearing or appear at a
requested hearing shall be considered a default judgment against the defen-
dant.
If a hearing is requested, the hearing shall be held within twenty (20)
days of the date the hearing request was received by the department unless
this period is, for good cause shown, extended by the hearing officer for a
ten (10) day period. Such extension shall not operate as a stay of the sus-
pension, notwithstanding an extension of the hearing date beyond such thirty
(30) day period. Written notice of the date and time of the hearing shall
be sent to the party requesting the hearing at least seven (7) business days
prior to the scheduled hearing date. The department may conduct all hearings
by telephone if each participant in the hearing has an opportunity to partic-
ipate in the entire proceeding while it is taking place.
The hearing shall be recorded. The sworn statement of the arresting of-
ficer and the copy of the notice of suspension and the notice of the require-
ment to install the ignition interlock system issued by the officer shall
be admissible at the hearing without further evidentiary foundation. The
results of any tests for alcohol concentration or the presence of drugs or
other intoxicating substances by analysis of blood, urine or breath adminis-
tered at the direction of the peace officer and the records relating to cal-
ibration, certification, approval or quality control pertaining to equip-
ment utilized to perform the tests shall be admissible as provided in section


18-8004(4), Idaho Code. The arresting officer shall not be required to par-
ticipate unless directed to do so by a subpoena issued by the hearing offi-
cer.
The burden of proof shall be on the person requesting the hearing. The
hearing officer shall not vacate the suspension unless he finds, by a prepon-
derance of the evidence, that:
(a) The peace officer did not have legal cause to stop the person; or
(b) The officer did not have legal cause to believe the person had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of alcohol, drugs or other intoxicating substances in viola-
tion of the provisions of section 18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho
Code; or
(c) The test results did not show an alcohol concentration or the pres-
ence of drugs or other intoxicating substances in violation of section
18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho Code; or
(d) The tests for alcohol concentration, drugs or other intoxicating
substances administered at the direction of the peace officer were not
conducted in accordance with the requirements of section 18-8004(4),
Idaho Code, or the testing equipment was not functioning properly when
the test was administered; or
(e) The person was not informed of the consequences of submitting to ev-
identiary testing as required in subsection (2) of this section.
If the hearing officer finds that the person has not met his burden of proof,
he shall sustain the suspension. The hearing officer shall make findings of
fact and conclusions of law and shall enter an order vacating or sustaining
the suspension. The findings of fact, conclusions of law and order entered
by the hearing officer shall be considered a final order pursuant to the pro-
visions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, except that motions for recon-
sideration of such order shall be allowed and new evidence can be submitted.
The facts as found by the hearing officer shall be independent of the de-
termination of the same or similar facts in the adjudication of any criminal
charges arising out of the same occurrence. The disposition of those crim-
inal charges shall not affect the suspension and the requirement to install
the ignition interlock system required to be imposed under the provisions of
this section. If a license is suspended under this section and the person is
also convicted on criminal charges arising out of the same occurrence for a
violation of the provisions of section 18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho
Code, both the suspension under this section and the suspension imposed pur-
suant to the provisions of section 18-8005 or 18-8006, Idaho Code, shall be
imposed, but the periods of suspension shall run concurrently, with the to-
tal period of suspension not to exceed the longer of the applicable suspen-
sion periods, unless the court ordering the suspension in the criminal case
orders to the contrary.
(8) Judicial review. A party aggrieved by the decision of the hear-
ing officer may seek judicial review of the decision in the manner provided
for judicial review of final agency action provided in chapter 52, title 67,
Idaho Code. Any petition for relief from the installation of an ignition in-
terlock device shall be filed in accordance with the provisions of section
18-8002(12), Idaho Code. An order for relief from the installation of an ig-


nition interlock device from any court shall apply to all statutory ignition
interlock requirements.
(9) Restricted noncommercial vehicle driving privileges. A person
served with a notice of suspension for ninety (90) days pursuant to this
section may apply to the department for restricted noncommercial vehicle
driving privileges, to become effective after the thirty (30) day absolute
suspension has been completed. The request may be made at any time after ser-
vice of the notice of suspension. Restricted noncommercial vehicle driving
privileges will be issued for the person to travel to and from work and for
work purposes not involving operation of a commercial vehicle, to attend an
alternative high school, work on a GED, for postsecondary education, or to
meet the medical needs of the person or his family if the person is eligible
for restricted noncommercial vehicle driving privileges. Any person whose
driving privileges are suspended under the provisions of this chapter may be
granted privileges to drive a noncommercial vehicle but shall not be granted
privileges to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(10) As used in this section, "at his expense," "at your expense" and "at
the offender's expense" include the cost of obtaining, installing, using and
maintaining an ignition interlock system.
(11) Rules. The department may adopt rules under pursuant to the provi-
sions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, deemed necessary to implement the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.